District of Columbia statutes.
42-147

Certificate of notarial acts.

(a)

A notarial act shall be evidenced by a certificate signed and dated by a notarial officer. The certificate shall include identification of the jurisdiction in which the notarial act is performed and the title of the office of the notarial officer and shall include the official stamp or seal of office. If the officer is a notary public, the certificate shall indicate the expiration date, if any, of the commission of office. Omission of the expiration date information may subsequently be corrected. If the officer is a commissioned officer on active duty in the military service of the United States, as provided in 10 U.S.C. § 936, the certificate shall include the officer’s rank and title of office.

(b)

A certificate of a notarial act shall be sufficient if the certificate meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and:

(1)

Is in the short form set forth in § 42-148;

(2)

Is in a form otherwise prescribed by the law of the District;

(3)

Is in a form prescribed by a law or regulation applicable in the place where the notarial act was performed; or

(4)

Sets forth the actions of the notarial officer and those actions that are sufficient to meet the requirements of the designated notarial act.

(c)

By executing a certificate of a notarial act, the notarial officer certifies that the officer has made the determinations required by § 42-142.

Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-205, § 8, 37 DCR 8444
Dec. 10, 1991, D.C. Law 9-52, § 2(a), 38 DCR 6585
This section is referenced in § 42-148.
1981 Ed., § 45-627.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Uniform Law on Notarial Acts Temporary Amendment Act of 1991 (D.C. Law 9-9, July 13, 1991, law notification 38 DCR 4812).

Application of 9-52: Section 3 of D.C. Law 9-52 provided that the act shall apply as of March 6, 1991.

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 7 of the Uniform Law on Notarial Acts.